Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-573
District; laws applicable.

All power plants and systems and all irrigation works constructed or otherwise acquired or used or operated by any reclamation district under the provisions of sections 46-501 to 46-573 or proposed by such districts to be so constructed, acquired, owned, used or operated, are hereby declared to be works of internal improvement. All laws applicable to works of internal improvement and all provisions of law now applicable to electric light and power corporations or to irrigation districts or to privately owned irrigation corporations as regards the power of eminent domain, the use and occupation of state and other public lands and highways, the appropriation or other acquisition or use of water, water power, water rights, or storage rights for any of the purposes contemplated in said sections, the manner or method of construction, physical operation of power plants, systems, transmission lines, and irrigation works, as herein contemplated, shall be applicable as nearly as may be to districts organized under sections 46-501 to 46-573 and in performance of the duties conferred or imposed upon them under the provisions of sections 46-501 to 46-573.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 39, p. 558.

This section provides that all works constructed or acquired shall be works of internal improvement, and authorizes the exercise of the power of eminent domain. Nebraska Mid-State Reclamation District v. Hall County, 152 Neb. 410, 41 N.W.2d 397 (1950).